Massachusetts, session 194th, H1419.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) The office of health resource planning established in section 22 of chapter 6D of the
General Laws, inserted by section 22 of chapter 343 of the Acts of 2024, shall conduct a focused
assessment on supply, distribution and capacity of pharmacy and pharmacological services
pursuant to subsection (b) of said section 22. The office, when conducting its focused
assessment, shall also identify the number of existing and potential pharmacy deserts in the
commonwealth and conduct an analysis of their impact or potential impact on access to
pharmacy and pharmacological services for residents located in the identified areas. For the
purposes of this section, a “pharmacy desert” shall mean an area where there is no or limited
access to pharmacies due to factors such as: (i) geographic location, specifically areas where the
nearest pharmacy is more than 1 mile away in urban areas, more than 5 miles away in suburban
areas and more than 10 miles away in rural areas; (ii) distance and travel time, defined as travel
time exceeding 15 minutes by car or 30 minutes by public transportation; and (iii) limited access
of 3

to transportation, both public and private, including areas with infrequent public transit services
or where at least 20 per cent of the population lacks access to private vehicles.
(b) Not later than September 1, 2026, the office shall present to the board of the health
policy commission its findings based on the focused assessment conducted under subsection (a)
and file a report of its findings with the clerks of the senate and house of representatives, the
house and senate committees on ways and means, the joint committee on health care financing,
the center for health information and analysis, the health policy commission and the department
of public health. In addition to the findings required by paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of section
22, report of the office shall analyze the impact or potential impact of pharmacy deserts
identified by the focused assessment, including, but not limited:
(i) an assessment on impacted neighborhoods and patient populations;
(ii) an assessment on the impact of pharmacy deserts on access to medications and health
care outcomes;
(iii) an assessment of the geographical and financial barriers to obtaining medications
faced by individuals living in pharmacy deserts;
(iv) an assessment of the average distance and travel time to a pharmacy from an
impacted neighborhood, and the transportation options available;
(v) an assessment on the impact of pharmacy deserts on overall health care costs,
including the costs of emergency department visits and hospitalizations;
(vi) an assessment on the impact of pharmacy benefit manager business practices in
contributing to the closures of pharmacies across the commonwealth; and
of 3

(vii) policy recommendations to address current pharmacy deserts and limit the creation
of new ones.
of 3